Missouri, session 2026, HB2410.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 67.1367, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 67.1367, to read as follows:
67.1367. 1. (1) The governing body of the following counties may impose a tax as
provided in this section:
(a) Any county of the third classification without a township form of government and
with more than eighteen thousand but fewer than twenty thousand inhabitants and with a city
of the fourth classification with more than eight thousand but fewer than nine thousand
inhabitants as the county seat;
(b) Any county with more than seventeen thousand six hundred but fewer than
nineteen thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than four thousand but fewer
than five thousand fifty inhabitants; [or]
(c) Any county with more than seventeen thousand six hundred but fewer than
nineteen thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than eight thousand but fewer
than ten thousand inhabitants; or
(d) Any county with more than twenty-two thousand but fewer than twenty-five
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than two thousand three
hundred but fewer than four thousand inhabitants.
(2) The governing body of any county listed in subdivision (1) of this subsection may
impose a tax on the charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels,
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2410 2
motels, bed and breakfast inns, or campground cabins situated in the county or a portion
thereof, which shall be no more than six percent per occupied room or cabin per night, except
that such tax shall not become effective unless the governing body of the county submits to
the voters of the county at a state general or primary election, a proposal to authorize the
governing body of the county to impose a tax pursuant to this section. The tax authorized by
this section shall be in addition to the charge for the sleeping room and shall be in addition to
any and all taxes imposed by law and the proceeds of such tax shall be used by the county
solely for the promotion of tourism. Such tax shall be stated separately from all other charges
and taxes.
2. The ballot of submission for the tax authorized in this section shall be in
substantially the following form:
Shall ______ (insert the name of the county) impose a tax on the
charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of
hotels, motels, bed and breakfast inns, and campground cabins
situated in ______ (name of county) at a rate of ______ (insert
rate of percent) percent for the sole purpose of promoting
tourism?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
3. As used in this section, "transient guests" means a person or persons who occupy a
room or rooms in a hotel, motel, bed and breakfast [inns] inn, [and] or campground [cabins]
cabin for thirty-one days or less during any calendar quarter.
4. Any county that imposed a tax on the charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the
transient guests of hotels and motels under this section before August 28, 2025, may impose
such tax upon the charges for all sleeping rooms or cabins paid by the transient guests of bed
and breakfast inns and campgrounds under this section without requiring a separate vote
authorizing the imposition of such tax upon such charges for such bed and breakfast inns and
campgrounds.
✔